Hawaii statutes.
§603-5 Salary of circuit court judges.
Effective July 1, 2004, the salary of a circuit court judge shall be as last
recommended by the judicial salary commission. Effective July 1, 2007, and
every six years thereafter, the salary of each circuit court judge of the
various circuit courts of the State shall be as last recommended by the
commission on salaries pursuant to section 26‑56, unless disapproved by
the legislature. [L Sp 1959 1st, c 4, §2; am L 1962, c 28, §30b; am L 1965, c
223, §13; Supp, §215-4.5; HRS §603-5; am L 1969, c 127, §11; am L 1975, c 58,
§27; am L 1982, c 129, §26; am L 1986, c 128, §24; am L 1990, c 72, §5; am L
1999, c 65, §6; am L 2000, c 2, §4; am L 2003, c 123, §4; am L 2006, c 299, §9]

Cross References

Appointment, tenure, removal, retirement, see Const. Art. VI,
§§3, 5.

Retirement allowance, see §88-74.

Case Notes

Cited: 57 H. 348, 555 P.2d 1329.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next